Maine, session 132, LD493.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2601, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. "Perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 1732, subsection
5-A.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2660-T, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 230, §3, is amended to read:
§2660-T. Uniform testing recommendation; specified contaminants and properties
The department shall develop a uniform recommendation for the testing for specific
contaminants or properties for which residential private drinking water wells should
periodically be tested. The uniform recommendation must specify contaminants or
properties that should be included in the periodic testing, including but not limited to
arsenic, bacteria, nitrates, nitrites, chloride, hardness, copper, iron, pH, sodium, lead,
uranium, manganese, fluoride, perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances and radon,
unless the department determines that testing for a contaminant or property listed in this
section is not necessary based on previous test results or credible scientific evidence. The
department or an entity that provides testing of or provides education or advertisements
related to testing of a residential private drinking water well shall include the uniform
recommendation developed by the department pursuant to this section in its written
materials related to testing of a residential private drinking water well.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2660-Y, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 483, Pt. BB, §7, is amended
to read:
§2660-Y. Landlord arsenic well water testing
Beginning January 1, 2022 and every 5 years thereafter, a landlord of a residential
building shall test the water for arsenic and other contaminants or properties specified
pursuant to section 2660-T in each private drinking water well used to provide water to a
tenant of the landlord. The landlord shall conduct testing under this section through a
Page 1 - 132LR1335(07)

laboratory certified or accredited pursuant to section 567 and shall, within 10 days of
notification of the results, provide to each of the landlord's tenants the results of any test
conducted under this section of the private drinking water well used to provide water to the
tenant. The landlord shall, within 10 days of notification of the results, notify any new
tenant of the most recent results of a test conducted under this section on a private drinking
water well that will be used to provide water to the tenant.
Sec. 4. 33 MRSA §173, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 476, §1, is amended
to read:
E. Whether the seller has experienced a problem such as an unsatisfactory water test
or, a water test with notations or a water test that detects perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances as defined in Title 32, section 1732, subsection 5-A;
Sec. 5. Residential testing for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances. No later than January 1, 2027, a landlord of a residential building with a
water supply provided by a private drinking water well shall test the well water for
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. The landlord shall conduct testing under
this section through a laboratory certified or accredited pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 567 using the most recent analytical methods approved by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency that quantifies the maximum amount of
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances detected by the test. For purposes of this
section, "perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" has the same meaning as in Title
32, section 1732, subsection 5-A.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the creation of brochures adding perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances to the uniform recommendation for testing private drinking
water wells.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $16,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $16,000
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Establishes one Environmental Specialist III position to implement rulemaking,
outreach and education related to well water testing requirements for landlords and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $99,621
All Other $0 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $106,877
Page 2 - 132LR1335(07)

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $122,877
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $122,877
Page 3 - 132LR1335(07)